Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.127

Driving while under the influence of liquor or drugs—Minimum penalties.

No county may establish a penalty for an act that constitutes the crime of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as provided for in RCW 46.61.502, or the crime of being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as provided in RCW 46.61.504, that is less than the penalties prescribed for those crimes in RCW 46.61.5055.

[ 1995 c 332 s 9; 1994 c 275 s 37; 1983 c 165 s 41.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1995 c 332: See notes following RCW 46.20.308.

Short title—Effective date—1994 c 275: See notes following RCW 46.04.015.

Legislative finding, intent—Effective dates—Severability—1983 c 165: See notes following RCW 46.20.308.